Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
CHAPTER 4 Guardians of Adults

Cross references.

Protective services for abused, neglected, or exploited disabled adults, §

30-5-1

et seq.

Claim by guardian or trustee or mental incompetent or minor, §

34-9-85

.

Appointment of guardian for incompetent adult for purposes of administering workers’ compensation benefits to which such incompetent adult is entitled, §

34-9-226

.

Appointment of representatives and guardians ad litem for persons undergoing treatment for mental illness, mental retardation, alcoholism, §§

37-3-147

,

37-4-107

,

37-7-147

.

Rights and privileges of patients and their representatives, T. 37, C. 3, Art. 6.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that: “all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

Law reviews.

For article, “The Georgia Law of Insanity,” see 3 Ga. B. J. 28 (1941).

For note on 1995 amendments of Code sections in this chapter, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 216 (1995).

For note, “Deinstitutionalization: Georgia’s Progress in Developing and Implementing an ‘Effectively Working Plan’ as Required by Olmstead v. L.C. ex rel,” see 25 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 699 (2009).

For article, “The Olmstead Decision: The Road to Dignity and Freedom,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 651 (2010).

For article, “Olmstead’s Promise and Cohousing’s Potential,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 663 (2010).

For article, “From the Inside Out: Personal Perspectives of Six Georgians on Their Institutional Experiences,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 741 (2010).

For article, “The Constitutional Right to Community Services,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 763 (2010).

For article, “Reconsidering Makin v. Hawaii:
The Right of Medicaid Beneficiaries to Home-Based Services as an Alternative to Institutionalization,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 803 (2010).

For article, “The Potential and Risks of Relying on Title II’s Integration Mandate to Close Segregated Institutions,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 855 (2010).

For article, “Beyond Residential Segregation: The Application of Olmstead to Segregated Employment Settings,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 875 (2010).

For article, “From Almshouses to Nursing Homes and Community Care: Lessons from Medicaid’s History,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 937 (2010).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 325 (2012).